New Jersey, session 221, A4687.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1991, c.397 (C.2C:58-15) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  A person who knows or reasonably should know that a minor is likely to gain access to a loaded firearm at a premises under the person's control commits a disorderly persons offense if a minor gains access to the firearm, unless the person: (1)   Stores the firearm in a securely locked box or container; (2)   Stores the firearm in a location which a reasonable person would believe to be secure; or (3)   Secures the firearm with a trigger lock. b.    This section shall not apply: (1)   To activities authorized by section 14 of P.L.1979, c.179 [,] (C.2C:58-6.1) [,] concerning the lawful use of a firearm by a minor; or (2)   Under circumstances where a minor obtained a firearm as a result of an unlawful entry by any person. c.     As used in this act, "minor" means a person under the age of [16] 18. d.    A law enforcement officer who observes that a person has not complied with the provisions of this section shall return at a later date to the premises under the persons control to ensure that the person has stored or secured the firearm pursuant to subsection a. of this section. (cf: P.L.1991, c.397, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under section 1 of P.L.1991, c.397 (C.2C:58-15), a firearm owner is prohibited from leaving a loaded firearm within easy access of a minor under the age of 16.  This bill increases the age of a minor to under the age of 18. The bill also requires a law enforcement officer who observes that a firearm owner has not properly stored or secured his or her firearm to return to the firearm owners premises to ensure that the firearms are properly secured. Under section 1 of P.L.1991, c.397 (C.2C:58-15), unless a firearm owner takes certain precautions, the owner is guilty of a disorderly persons offense if he or she knows, or reasonably should know, that a minor is likely to gain access to a loaded firearm at a premises under the owners control and the minor gains access to the firearm.  The precautions required under the law include storing the firearm in a securely locked box, secure location, or with a trigger lock.  A disorderly persons offense is punishable by up to six months imprisonment, a fine of up to $1,000, or both.